Utah statutes.
38-1a-306.   Substantial compliance.

(1)  Substantial compliance with the requirements of this chapter is sufficient to claim, as applicable, a preconstruction lien or a construction lien.

(2)  Subsection (1) may not be construed to excuse compliance with or affect the requirement to file:

(a)  a notice of preconstruction service as provided in Section 38-1a-401 in order to claim a preconstruction lien; or

(b)  a preliminary notice as provided in Section 38-1a-501 in order to claim a construction lien.



Amended by Chapter 464, 2013 General Session

